District of Columbia statutes.
4-1451.03

Signage.

The Mayor shall develop and post uniform signage with a toll-free number to call for further information in a conspicuous place on the exterior of each Authorized Receiving Facility that states in plain terms that a newborn may be surrendered at the facility in accordance with this chapter.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-158, § 103, 57 DCR 3000
Sections 4 of D.C. Law 18-29 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 4. Signage.
“An Authorized Receiving Facility shall post a sign in a conspicuous place on the exterior of the facility that states in plain terms that a newborn may be surrendered at the facility in accordance with this act.”
Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 18-29 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Newborn Safe Haven Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-49, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3581).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 103 of Newborn Safe Haven Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-321, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1842).